District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.08

Temporary personnel and procurement authority.

Effective until October 1, 2009, the Department shall exercise:

(1)

Personnel authority to hire, retain, and terminate personnel as appropriate to perform the functions of the Department consistent with Chapter 6 of Title 1, including establishing compensation and reimbursement consistent with the District’s wage grade and non-wage grade schedules and the Congressionally approved budget; and

(2)

Procurement authority independent of the Office of Contracting and Procurement, consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2; except that § 2-352.01a shall not apply.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 9, 55 DCR 216
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 209, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2; except that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply” for “consistent with § 2-301.01 et seq.; except with regard to the powers and duties set forth in § 2-301.05(a), (b), (c), and (e)” in (2).